North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 1. Regulation and Inspection.

§ 66-1.
County commissioners to appoint inspectors.

The board of county commissioners may appoint for their county or any township thereof inspectors for any article of commerce the inspection of which is not otherwise provided for by law, who shall hold office for the term of five years after their employment.

History.

Rev., ss. 4637, 4669; C.S., s. 5068.

Local Modification.

Board of Trustees of Guilford Technical Community College: 2011-153, s. 1, as amended by 2014-100, s. 10.9(a).

§ 66-2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 108, s. 22.

§ 66-3.
Bond of inspector; fees.

The said inspector shall enter into bond in the sum of five hundred dollars ($500.00), payable to the State of North Carolina, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of his office, which bond the board shall take; and he shall be entitled to such fees as may be prescribed by the board.

History.

1848, c. 43, s. 3; R.C., c. 60, s. 76; Code, s. 3053; Rev., s. 4671; C.S., s. 5071.

§ 66-4.
Falsely acting as inspector.

If any person, who is not a legal or sworn inspector of lumber or other articles, presume to act as such, he shall forfeit and pay one hundred dollars ($100.00), and be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1824, c. 1254, s. 3; R.C., c. 60, s. 69; Code, s. 3046; Rev., s. 3580; C.S., s. 5072; 1993, c. 539, s. 503; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 66-5.
Penalty for sale without inspection.

If any person shall sell any article of forage or provision, of which inspection is required in accordance with this Article, without the same having been inspected as required, he shall, for every offense, forfeit and pay one hundred dollars ($100.00).

The clear proceeds of penalties provided for in this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1850, c. 74, s. 2; R.C., c. 60, s. 77; Code, s. 3054; Rev., s. 4672; C.S., s. 5073; 1998-215, s. 40.

§ 66-6.
Penalty on master receiving without inspection.

No master or commander of any vessel shall take on board any cask or barrel or other commodity, liable to inspection as aforesaid, without its being inspected and branded as required, under the penalty of two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each offense.

The clear proceeds of penalties provided for in this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1784, c. 206, s. 6; R.C., c. 60, s. 59; Code, ss. 3036, 3037; Rev., ss. 4657, 4658; C.S., s. 5074; 1998-215, s. 41.

Local Modification.

Town of New Bern: C.S., G.S. 5074.

§ 66-7.
Who to pay inspectors’ fees; penalty for extortion.

The fees of inspectors shall be paid by the purchaser or exporter of the articles inspected, and if any inspector shall receive any greater fees than are by law allowed, he shall forfeit and pay ten dollars ($10.00) for every offense to any person suing for the same.

History.

1824, c. 1254, ss. 1, 2; R.C., c. 60, s. 79; Code, s. 3055; Rev., s. 4673; C.S., s. 5075.

§ 66-8.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 379, s. 18.3.

§ 66-9.
Gas and electric light bills to show reading of meter.

It shall be the duty of all gas companies and electric light companies selling gas and electricity to the public to show, among other things, on all statements or bills rendered to consumers, the reading of the meter at the end of the preceding month, and the reading of the meter at the end of the current month, and the amount of electricity, in kilowatt hours, and of gas, in feet, consumed for the current month; provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall be construed to prohibit any gas or electric company from adopting any method of and times of reading meters and rendering bills that may be approved by the North Carolina Utilities Commission.

Any gas or electric light company failing to render bills or statements, as provided for in this section, shall be subject to a penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) for each violation of this section or failure to render such statements, recoverable in the district court by any person suing for the same; but this section shall not apply to bills and accounts rendered customers on flat rate contracts.

History.

1915, c. 259; C.S., s. 5082; 1959, c. 987; 1973, c. 108, s. 23.

§ 66-10.
Failure of dealers of scrap, salvage, or surplus to keep record of purchases of certain items misdemeanor.

Every person, firm, or corporation buying rubber or leather, rubber belts, and belting, as scrap, salvage, or surplus shall keep a register containing a true and accurate record of each purchase, including the description of the article purchased, the name from whom purchased, the amount paid for the article purchased, the date of the purchase, and any and all marks or brands upon the rubber or leather, rubber belts, and belting. This register and the rubber, leather, rubber belts, and belting purchased shall be at all times open to the inspection of the public. A failure to comply with these requirements or the making of a false entry concerning the rubber or leather, rubber belts, or belting shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Every person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of buying or dealing in scrap, salvage, or surplus, including glass, waste paper, burlap, cloth, cordage, rubber, leather, or belting of every kind, in addition to the above requirements under subsection (a) of this section, shall make and keep a record of the name and address of the person from whom this scrap, salvage, or surplus is purchased and the license number, if any, and if there is no license, a description of the vehicle in which this scrap, salvage, or surplus is delivered. Any person, firm, or corporation which fails to comply with the requirements of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction shall only be fined not in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00) in the discretion of the court.

History.

1917, c. 46; C.S., s. 5090; 1957, c. 791; 1993, c. 295, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 504; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Local Modification.

Anson: C.S., G.S. 5090; Beaufort, Bertie: 1953, c. 1154; Caldwell, Davidson: C.S., G.S. 5090; Harnett, Martin, Perquimans: 1953, c. 1154; Randolph, Robeson: C.S., G.S. 5090; Stanly: 1939, c. 154; Washington: 1953, c. 1154.

§§ 66-11,
66-11.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-46, s. 26, effective October 1, 2012, and applicable to offenses committed on or after that date.

History.

S. 66-11; 1907, c. 464; 1909, c. 855, s. 1; C.S., s. 5091; 1967, c. 792; 1971, c. 1231, s. 1; 1975, c. 182, s. 2; 1993, c. 295, s. 2; c. 539, s. 505; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 40; c. 24, s. 14(c); 2007-301, s. 1; 2009-200, s. 1; repealed by 2012-46, s. 26, effective October 1, 2012. s. 66-11; 1975, c. 182, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 506; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2012-46, s. 26, effective October 1, 2012.

Cross References.

As to injuring wires and other fixtures of telephone, telegraph, and electric-power companies,

G.S. 14-154

.

§ 66-11.2.

Recodified as

G.S. 66-426

by Session Laws 2012-46, s. 27, effective October 1, 2012, and applicable to offenses committed on or after that date.